District of Columbia statutes.
2-414

Excessive verdicts.

In any case involving any claim described in § 2-412 in which the trial court shall consider the verdict excessive, the court may order a remittitur of so much of the amount of such verdict or judgment, as the case may be, as it considers excessive, and either permit the party in whose favor the verdict was rendered or the party recovering such judgment, as the case may be, to file a remittitur.

History

July 14, 1960, 74 Stat. 520, Pub. L. 86-654, § 5

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1214.
1973 Ed., § 1-924.